District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.53

Executive Service pay plan.

(a)

A person appointed to a position in the Executive Service shall be appointed at the level on the DX Schedule or DX Public Safety Schedule designated for the subordinate agency to which he or she is appointed, and shall receive a salary set at any amount within the salary range for that level that the Mayor determines to be appropriate.

(b)

The salary of any person holding an appointment to a position in the Executive Service may, at any time, be increased or decreased by the Mayor, at his or her sole discretion, to any other salary within the salary range for the level occupied.

(c)

The salary of an employee in the Executive Service who is temporarily assigned to a position at a higher or lower level on the DX Schedule or DX Public Safety Schedule shall be set, at the discretion of the Mayor, at any rate within the salary range of the level to which the employee is temporarily assigned or the salary range of the level of the position from which officially appointed.

(d)

A person paid from the DX Schedule shall not be entitled to premium pay.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1053
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-267, § 2(d), 62 DCR 1543
1981 Ed., § 1-611.53.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-267 added “or DX Public Safety Schedule” in (a) and (c).
Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.